Missouri, session 2026, HB2195.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 170.027, to read as follows:
170.027. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Integrated Safe Driving Program".
2. As used in this section, "driver education instruction" means instruction
provided under the Missouri integrated safe driving program that offers instruction in
the use and operation of motor vehicles including, but not limited to, instruction in the
safe operation of motor vehicles and rules of the road and the laws of this state relating
to motor vehicles.
3. (1) The state department of elementary and secondary education shall receive
and vet sample lessons from recognized statewide professional organizations and
districts that meet the requirements of the Missouri integrated safe driving program.
(2) Sample lessons shall be made available to each public school district and
charter school offering courses to pupils in grades nine through twelve.
(3) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, each public
school district and charter school offering courses to pupils in grades nine through
twelve may adopt a plan implementing the Missouri integrated safe driving program,
which may use the sample lessons.
4. The Missouri integrated safe driving program shall:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2195 2
(1) Inform pupils about the requirements for obtaining and driving with an
instruction permit, an intermediate license, and a full driver license under Missouri's
graduated driver license law as established in chapter 302;
(2) Emphasize the development of knowledge, attitudes, habits, and skills
necessary for the safe operation of motor vehicles;
(3) Provide instruction on distracted driving as a major traffic safety issue;
(4) Provide instruction concerning law enforcement procedures for traffic stops,
including a demonstration of the proper actions to be taken during a traffic stop and
appropriate interactions with law enforcement;
(5) Provide pupils with current data on driver safety related to risky behaviors;
and
(6) Provide instruction on safety concerns relating to pedestrians, commercial
motor vehicles, motorcycles and other potentially hazardous encounters on the road.
5. Districts may require pupils to participate in lessons devoted to addressing the
requirements of the Missouri integrated safe driving program in courses as determined
by the district. These lessons shall meet standards within the content of the course but
use safe driving as the context and application of the course standards.
6. (1) The driver education instruction under this section shall not require any
pupil to physically operate a motor vehicle as part of such instruction.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit any public school district or
charter school from offering an elective driver education course that is different from
the driver education instruction required under this section.
7. The state board of education may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid
and void.
✔